Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 5. Assault and Battery
In a case in which defendant was charged with aggravated assault, defendant failed to establish that either plain error or an abuse of discretion occurred when the district court did not give an instruction defining attempt. Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 1988, 201 L. Ed. 2d 248, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 3049 (U.S. 2018).

Instruction on self-defense. —

Self-defense instruction regarding the aggravated assault charge could have been read by the jury to require that defendant was actually being physically assaulted before he could defend himself, which the statute did not require. Drennen v. State, 2013 WY 118, 311 P.3d 116,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2013).

Jury should have been more clearly informed that it was sufficient for a claim of self-defense to the aggravated assault charge that defendant reasonably perceived danger, even if such danger was not real. Drennen v. State, 2013 WY 118, 311 P.3d 116,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2013).

Jury instruction proper. —

Trial court did not err in denying defendant's motion for a new trial because
under the plain language of
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(a)(iii), the jury was required to determine whether defendant's
threat to use a drawn deadly weapon was reasonably necessary; the
jury was properly instructed and the instructions were consistent
with the law propounded by defendant.
Mendoza v. State, 2013 WY 55, 300 P.3d 487,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2013).

Instruction on lesser-included offenses. —

Defendant charged with aggravated assault and battery was not entitled to jury instruction on lesser-included offenses of simple assault and of battery, since a rational jury could conclude only that defendant was using his vehicle in a manner reasonably capable of producing death or serious bodily injury. Carey v. State, 984 P.2d 1098,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 137

(Wyo. 1999).

Instruction on aggravated assault and battery as lesser-included offense of attempted second-degree murder. —

In a prosecution for attempted second-degree murder, defendant was not entitled to an instruction on aggravated assault and battery, as the latter does not include any of the elements of the former. Bilderback v. State, 13 P.3d 249,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 218

(Wyo. 2000), reh'g denied,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. Dec. 5, 2000), modified,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. Dec. 15, 2000), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Aggravated burglary (§

6-3-301

) and aggravated assault and battery statutes do not proscribe same offense,

and multiple punishments therefor do not violate the constitutional double jeopardy prohibition.
Lauthern v. State, 769 P.2d 350,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1989).

Conviction for burglary and acquittal for aggravated assault not inconsistent. —

Verdict was not inconsistent, where the jury found the defendant guilty of burglary under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-301

, acquitted him of aggravated assault under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-502

, but found him guilty of the lesser included offense of battery under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-501

; in order to find the defendant guilty of burglary, the jury only had to determine that the defendant entered the residence with the intent to commit the felony of aggravated assault. Moore v. State, 2003 WY 153, 80 P.3d 191,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2003).

Separate sentences for aggravated assault and aggravated robbery. —

Aggravated assault and aggravated robbery each require an element not necessary to the other, and one may commit two separate and distinct crimes by threateningly pointing a pistol at someone and exhibiting that same pistol to facilitate a robbery; separate sentences for appellant's separate crimes were therefore permissible. Rouse v. State, 966 P.2d 967,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Sentencing error was harmless. —

Although defendant was sentenced under an incorrect version of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-502(f)(ii) on an assault and battery charge, and not the version of the statute in effect at the time defendant committed the crime, the error was harmless under Wyo. R. Crim. P. 52(a) where defendant had already served more time than either version of the statute allowed.
Sarr v. State, 2007 WY 140, 166 P.3d 891,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2007).

Kidnapping and sexual assault did not merge. —

The force used to accomplish the kidnapping was sufficient justification to enhance the penalty for aggravated kidnapping where it was separate and distinct from the force and confinement the defendant imposed upon the victim, and where there were repeated sexual assaults in his vehicle, this was not an instance that would demand merger of the sexual assaults with the independent crime of aggravated kidnapping. McDermott v. State, 870 P.2d 339,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1994), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Dual sentences for aggravated assault and escape. —

The imposition of dual and consecutive sentences for aggravated assault and attempted escape (§§

6-5-206

and

6-1-304

), for a single violent escape attempt, which could have resulted in a single sentence under §

6-5-207

(escape by violence), did not violate double jeopardy constitutional provisions. Under the applicable statutory elements test, clearly different offenses were demonstrated, while the prosecutor had the requisite discretion to elect the charge or charges which could be brought based on the specific facts of the case. DeSpain v. State, 865 P.2d 584,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1993).

Crimes not required to be merged for sentencing. —

Where appellant pointed pistol at victims and exhibited shotgun in course of kidnapping victims and appropriating their truck and trailer rig, crimes of aggravated assault and battery, aggravated robbery, and kidnapping were not required to be merged for sentencing purposes. Rouse v. State, 966 P.2d 967,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

The legislature intended separate punishments

for the crime of aggravated kidnapping and for the crime of sexual assault in the first degree because, once the sexual assault is inflicted, the victim has been harmed and cannot be released “substantially unharmed.” McDermott v. State, 870 P.2d 339,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1994), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Evidence sufficient to show aggravated assault and battery. —

Evidence which included resisting arrest, having already injured one officer, being involved in a high speed car chase, giving false information, refusing to obey a second officer's instructions, trying to move his hand to retrieve a loaded and ready to fire handgun while involved in an altercation with the second officer and even after being told to stop, and later admitting that he was trying to kill the officer, was sufficient for a reasonable jury to find that defendant engaged in substantial conduct strongly corroborative of his intention to murder the second officer.
Cohen v. State, 2008 WY 78, 191 P.3d 956,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2008).

Evidence of aggravated assault.

Defendant was convicted of aggravated assault in violation of this section based on evidence that he got a gun from his car, pointed it at the victims, and fired twice.
Ken v. State, 2011 WY 167, 267 P.3d 567,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2011).

Right of self-defense not available to aggressor. —

In defendant's trial on charges of aggravated assault and battery and attempted second-degree murder following an altercation with a romantic rival, the trial court did not err in instructing the jury that the right of self-defense was not available to one who was the aggressor or provoked the conflict because the evidence supported the giving of this instruction where the victim testified that defendant had been the aggressor. Although defendant presented a contradictory version of the incident, the district court was not charged with resolving that conflict, which was within the jury's province.
Causey v. State, 2009 WY 111, 215 P.3d 287,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2009), reh'g denied,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. Sept. 29, 2009).

Condition of probation. —

Where a defendant entered Alford guilty pleas to violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-2-502

,

6-4-103

,

6-1-303

, and

6-2-302

, the district court did not abuse its discretion by imposing as a condition of his probation following his term of incarceration that he have no contact with his minor children. A no contact condition was reasonably related to the violent sexual crimes for which he was convicted and for which he was charged, and the provision did not impermissibly encroach on his fundamental right as a parent to raise his children. Perkins v. State, 2014 WY 11, 317 P.3d 584,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Elliott v. State, 47 Wyo. 36, 30 P.2d 791,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1934);
Porter v. State, 440 P.2d 249,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1968);
Gabrielson v. State, 510 P.2d 534,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1973);
Duran v. State, 546 P.2d 434,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1976);
Hampton v. State, 558 P.2d 504,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1977);
Dodge v. State, 562 P.2d 303,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1977);
Hurst v. State, 563 P.2d 232,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1977);
Vigil v. State, 563 P.2d 1344,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 252

(Wyo. 1977);
Fuller v. State, 568 P.2d 900,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1977);
Stambaugh v. State, 613 P.2d 1237,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1980);
Barnes v. State, 670 P.2d 302,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1983);
Fife v. State, 676 P.2d 565,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1984);
Phillips v. State, 760 P.2d 388,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1988);
Garcia v. State, 908 P.2d 413,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1995);
Sturgis v. State, 932 P.2d 199,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1997);
Hankinson v. State, 2002 WY 86, 47 P.3d 623,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2002); Johnson v. State, 2015 WY 118,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Sept. 3, 2015).

Quoted

in

Horn v. State, 554 P.2d 1141,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1976);
Furtado v. State, 623 P.2d 770,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1981);
Fulcher v. State, 633 P.2d 142,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 369

(Wyo. 1981);
Westwood v. State, 693 P.2d 763,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 426

(Wyo. 1985);
Maupin v. State, 694 P.2d 720,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 437

(Wyo. 1985);
Cardenas v. State, 811 P.2d 989,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1991);
Barron v. State, 819 P.2d 412,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1991);
Flores v. State, 822 P.2d 369,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1991);
Haworth v. State, 840 P.2d 912,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1992);
Smith v. State, 922 P.2d 846,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1996);
Eustice v. State, 11 P.3d 897,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2000);
Peitsmeyer v. State, 2001 WY 38, 21 P.3d 733,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2001);
Skinner v. State, 2001 WY 102, 33 P.3d 758,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2001);
Anderson v. State, 2002 WY 46, 43 P.3d 108,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2002);
Allen v. State, 2002 WY 48, 43 P.3d 551,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2002);
Trujillo v. State, 2002 WY 51, 44 P.3d 22,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2002);
Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003);
Vigil v. State, 2004 WY 110, 98 P.3d 172,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(2004);
Winsted v. State, 2010 WY 139, 241 P.3d 497,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Oct. 26, 2010).

Stated

in

Brooks v. State, 706 P.2d 664,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1985);
Laing v. State, 746 P.2d 1247,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 554

(Wyo. 1987);
Cardenas v. State, 925 P.2d 239,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Williams v. Campbell, 22 Wyo. 1, 133 P. 1071,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1913);
Wilson v. Hall, 34 Wyo. 465, 244 P. 1002,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(1926);
Hurst v. State, 519 P.2d 971,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1974);
Hays v. State, 522 P.2d 1004,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1974);
Hicklin v. State, 535 P.2d 743,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 142

, 79 A.L.R.3d 1050 (Wyo. 1975);
Kwallek v. State, 596 P.2d 1372,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 379

(Wyo. 1979);
Snyder v. State, 599 P.2d 1338,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 448

(Wyo. 1979);
Weddle v. State, 621 P.2d 231,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1980);
Schmidt v. State, 668 P.2d 656,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1983);
Bibbins v. State, 741 P.2d 115,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1987);
Aguilar v. State, 764 P.2d 684,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1988);
Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992);
Coleman v. State, 843 P.2d 558,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1992);
Doud v. State, 845 P.2d 402,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1993);
Scott v. State, 856 P.2d 447,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 12

0 (Wyo. 1993);
Olson v. State, 960 P.2d 1019,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1998);
Ramirez v. State, 994 P.2d 970,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2000);
Oldman v. State, 998 P.2d 957,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2000);
Terry v. State, 2002 WY 162, 56 P.3d 636,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2002);
Urbigkit v. State, 2003 WY 57, 67 P.3d 1207,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2003);
Gomez v. State, 2003 WY 58, 68 P.3d 1177,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2003);
Jensen v. State, 2005 WY 85, 116 P.3d 1088,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(2005);
Miller v. State, 2006 WY 92, 138 P.3d 688,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(2006);
Jones v. State, 2009 WY 33, 203 P.3d 1091,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Mar. 9, 2009);
Creecy v. State, 2009 WY 89, 210 P.3d 1089,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(July 10, 2009);
Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Dec. 28, 2011);
Scott v. State, 2012 WY 86, 278 P.3d 747,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(June 18, 2012); Lindstrom v. State, 2015 WY 28,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Feb. 25, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion “Albatross” Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Homicide based on killing of unborn child, 40 ALR3d 444.

Right to maintain action or to recover damages for death of unborn child, 84 ALR3d 411.

Automobile as dangerous or deadly weapon within meaning of assault and battery statute, 89 ALR3d 1026.

Pocket or clasp knife as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statute aggravating offenses such as assault, robbery, or homicide, 100 ALR3d 287.

Admissibility, in criminal case, of results of residue detection test to determine whether accused or victim handled or fired gun, 1 ALR4th 1072.

Walking cane as deadly or dangerous weapon for purpose of statutes aggravating offenses such as assault and robbery, 8 ALR4th 842.

Parts of the human body, other than feet, as deadly or dangerous weapons for purposes of statutes aggravating offenses, 8 ALR4th 1268.

Admissibility of expert or opinion testimony on battered wife or battered woman syndrome, 18 ALR4th 1153.

Criminal assault or battery statutes making attack on elderly person a special or aggravated offense, 73 ALR4th 1123.

Admissibility of expert opinion stating whether a particular knife was, or could have been, the weapon used in a crime, 83 ALR4th 660.

Sufficiency of bodily injury to support charge of aggravated assault, 5 ALR5th 243.

Employer's liability for assault, theft, or similar intentional wrong committed by employee at home or business of customer, 13 ALR5th 217.

Kicking as aggravated assault, or assault with dangerous or deadly weapon, 19 ALR5th 823.

Admissibility of threats to defendant made by third parties to support claim of self-defense in criminal prosecution for assault or homicide, 55 ALR5th 449.

Prosecution of mother for prenatal substance abuse based on endangerment of or delivery of controlled substance to child, 70 ALR5th 461.

Attempt to commit assault as criminal offense, 93 ALR5th 683.

Dog as deadly or dangerous weapon for purposes of statutes aggravating offenses such as assault and robbery, 124 ALR5th 657.

Cigarette lighter as deadly or dangerous weapon, 22 ALR6th 533.

What constitutes “otherwise using” weapon under sentencing guideline § 2A2.2(b)(2), providing enhancement of sentence for aggravated assault, 120 ALR Fed 589.